Hawaii statutes.
§421-24 Application to existing
association. Except where otherwise expressly stated herein, this chapter
shall be applicable to any existing association formed under any law of the
State providing for the incorporation of agricultural cooperative associations,
for a purpose for which an association may be formed under this chapter. [L
1949, c 234, pt of §1; RL 1955, §176-24; HRS §421-24]

Previous
Vol08_Ch0401-0429
Next